apertium-sv-da/dev/saldo/saldo.nouns.dix
<pardef n="y__n_nt">
  <e>       <p><l>y</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>:s</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-s</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-et</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-t</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>:et</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>:t</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-ets</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-ts</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>:ets</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>:ts</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>:n</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-n</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>:ns</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-ns</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-na</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>:na</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-nas</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>:nas</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="nexus__n_ut">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="yxhuvud__n_nt">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ets</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ens</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ena</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>enas</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="asyndeton__n_nt">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ens</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="b/ok__n_ut">
  <e>       <p><l>ok</l>        <r>ok<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oks</l>       <r>ok<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oken</l>      <r>ok<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>okens</l>     <r>ok<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>öcker</l>     <r>ok<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>okar</l>      <r>ok<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>öckers</l>    <r>ok<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>okars</l>     <r>ok<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>öckerna</l>   <r>ok<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>okarna</l>    <r>ok<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>öckernas</l>  <r>ok<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>okarnas</l>   <r>ok<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="gehenna__n_nt">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>s</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ts</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="bränsleomvand/lare__n_ut">
  <e>       <p><l>lare</l>      <r>lare<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>lares</l>     <r>lare<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>laren</l>     <r>lare<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>larens</l>    <r>lare<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>rar</l>       <r>lare<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>lare</l>      <r>lare<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>rars</l>      <r>lare<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>lares</l>     <r>lare<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>rarna</l>     <r>lare<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>rarnas</l>    <r>lare<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="blomkålshuvud">   <i>blomkålshuvud</i><par n="yxhuvud__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="bränsleomvandlare"><i>bränsleomvand</i><par n="bränsleomvand/lare__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="bakhuvud">        <i>bakhuvud</i><par n="yxhuvud__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="piphuvud">        <i>piphuvud</i><par n="yxhuvud__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="yxhuvud">         <i>yxhuvud</i><par n="yxhuvud__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="kålhuvud">        <i>kålhuvud</i><par n="yxhuvud__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="ledhuvud">        <i>ledhuvud</i><par n="yxhuvud__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="asyndeton">       <i>asyndeton</i><par n="asyndeton__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="slughuvud">       <i>slughuvud</i><par n="yxhuvud__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="överhuvud">       <i>överhuvud</i><par n="yxhuvud__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="hundhuvud">       <i>hundhuvud</i><par n="yxhuvud__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="salladshuvud">    <i>salladshuvud</i><par n="yxhuvud__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="blomhuvud">       <i>blomhuvud</i><par n="yxhuvud__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="forshuvud">       <i>forshuvud</i><par n="yxhuvud__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="läshuvud">        <i>läshuvud</i><par n="yxhuvud__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="slusshuvud">      <i>slusshuvud</i><par n="yxhuvud__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="barnhuvud">       <i>barnhuvud</i><par n="yxhuvud__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="pirhuvud">        <i>pirhuvud</i><par n="yxhuvud__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="pundhuvud">       <i>pundhuvud</i><par n="yxhuvud__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="struphuvud">      <i>struphuvud</i><par n="yxhuvud__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="kvickhuvud">      <i>kvickhuvud</i><par n="yxhuvud__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="klokhuvud">       <i>klokhuvud</i><par n="yxhuvud__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="y">               <i>y</i><par n="y__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="hästhuvud">       <i>hästhuvud</i><par n="yxhuvud__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="brevhuvud">       <i>brevhuvud</i><par n="yxhuvud__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="knappnålshuvud">  <i>knappnålshuvud</i><par n="yxhuvud__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="brushuvud">       <i>brushuvud</i><par n="yxhuvud__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="ljushuvud">       <i>ljushuvud</i><par n="yxhuvud__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="eselhuvud">       <i>eselhuvud</i><par n="yxhuvud__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="statsöverhuvud">  <i>statsöverhuvud</i><par n="yxhuvud__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="dumhuvud">        <i>dumhuvud</i><par n="yxhuvud__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="brohuvud">        <i>brohuvud</i><par n="yxhuvud__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="tabellhuvud">     <i>tabellhuvud</i><par n="yxhuvud__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="bjälkhuvud">      <i>bjälkhuvud</i><par n="yxhuvud__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="bok">             <i>b</i><par n="b/ok__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="ultimus">         <i>ultimus</i><par n="nexus__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="discessus">       <i>discessus</i><par n="nexus__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="diabetes">        <i>diabetes</i><par n="nexus__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="gehenna">         <i>gehenna</i><par n="gehenna__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="nystagmus">       <i>nystagmus</i><par n="nexus__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="primas">          <i>primas</i><par n="nexus__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="solarplexus">     <i>solarplexus</i><par n="nexus__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="epidermis">       <i>epidermis</i><par n="nexus__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="uterus">          <i>uterus</i><par n="nexus__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="glottis">         <i>glottis</i><par n="nexus__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="konditionalis">   <i>konditionalis</i><par n="nexus__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="nexus">           <i>nexus</i><par n="nexus__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="elefantiasis">    <i>elefantiasis</i><par n="nexus__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="primus">          <i>primus</i><par n="nexus__n_ut"/></e>
